District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0620.
BE IT ENACTED, BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Nationals Ballpark Amended and Restated Lease Emergency Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), and An Act Authorizing the sale
of certain real estate in the District of Columbia no longer required for public purposes, approved
August 5, 1939 (53 Stat. 1211; D.C. Official Code § 10-801 et seq.), the Council approves,
pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and the Washington Convention and Sports
Authority (“Events DC”) may enter into, the Amended and Restated Lease Agreement between
Events DC and Washington Nationals Stadium, LLC, submitted by Events DC on March 2,
2026.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2